Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.050

Identifying information—Disclosure.

(1) Identifying information about complainants or witnesses is not subject to any method of legal compulsion and may not be revealed to the legislature or the governor except under the following circumstances: (a) The complainant or witness waives confidentiality; (b) under a legislative subpoena when there is a legislative investigation for neglect of duty or misconduct by the ombuds or ombuds' office when the identifying information is necessary to the investigation of the ombuds' acts; or (c) under an investigation or inquiry by the governor as to neglect of duty or misconduct by the ombuds or ombuds' office when the identifying information is necessary to the investigation of the ombuds' acts. Consistently with this section, the ombuds must act to protect sensitive client information.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "identifying information" includes the complainant's or witness's name, location, telephone number, likeness, social security number or other identification number, or identification of immediate family members.

[ 2016 c 172 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.